Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2633.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2604-J and 2605-J(a)(3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are repealed:[Section 2604-J. Maintenance program.(a) Grant program to be established.--The department shall establish a maintenance project grant program to support school entity maintenance projects.(b) Eligibility.--Maintenance projects that are eligible for grants under this section shall include the following:(1) Roof repairs and roof replacement.123456789101112131415161718192021 (2) Heating, ventilation and air conditioning equipment.(3) Boilers and controls.(4) Plumbing systems.(5) Energy savings projects.(6) Health and safety upgrades.(7) Emergencies.(8) Other projects approved by the secretary.(c) Application process.--The department shall develop a process through which school entities may submit applications for grant awards.(d) Funding rubric.--The department shall develop a rubric to prioritize grant awards under this section. The rubric shall consider the following:(1) School entity wealth.(2) Prior receipt of grant awards.(3) Building conditions.(4) Emergencies.(5) Safety and security.(e) Local match required.--(1) A school entity shall provide a 50% match for each grant awarded.(2) No matching funds shall be required for a project that is determined by the secretary to be an emergency.(f) Limitation on grant award.--(1) No grant award for a maintenance project may exceed $1,000,000.(2) No school entity may receive an annual allocation of grants that exceeds 20% of the funds available under the program.(g) Funding.--20260HB2633PN3599 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The program shall be funded from a set-aside equal to 25% of the appropriation for school building projects annually under this article.(2) No less than 20% of the funds allocated to the program under paragraph (1) shall be awarded to projects that enhance school building safety and security.(3) In any fiscal year when funds are available for grants under the program as provided in paragraph (1), the department shall allocate 50% of the set-aside for grants by December 31 and the other 50% of the set-aside for grants not later than June 30 of that fiscal year.(h) Transmission of information to General Assembly.--The department shall annually transmit grant award information to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, including grant amounts and scoring from the rubric under subsection (d).]Section 2605-J. Building condition assessments.(a) Duties of department.--* * * [(3) The department shall provide additional points under the funding rubric contained in section 2604-J(d) for grants applied for by school entities that complete building condition assessments.]* * *Section 2. Section 2606-J of the act is amended to read:Section 2606-J. Project reimbursement.(a) General rule.--The Commonwealth shall reimburse a school entity that receives department approval on an application under section 2602-J(a)(3) by the amount calculated as follows:20260HB2633PN3599 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Multiply the base reimbursement amount by the adjustment factor.(2) Multiply the product under paragraph (1) by the lesser of the project's enrollment and full-time equivalent building capacity.(3) Multiply the product under paragraph (2) by the school entity's wealth factor.[(b) Limitation.--The maximum payment under this section shall not exceed 65% of a project's structural cost.](c) Installment payments.--A school entity shall receive equal payments over 20 years totaling the amount determined for reimbursement under [subsections (a) and (b)] subsection (a).(d) Adjustment factor.--(1) Beginning July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2026, the adjustment factor shall be zero.(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the adjustment factor shall be one.Section 3. Section 2608-J of the act, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 2608-J. Applicability.(a) New projects.--This article shall apply to projects for which approval and reimbursement is sought [and to the maintenance project grant program] beginning July 1, 2026.(b) Existing projects.--(1) For a project not completed by a school entity before July 1, 2026, the school entity may retroactively seek approval for the project under section 2602-J(a).(2) For the purposes of this subsection, a project shall be considered completed when the impacted space is open and occupied.20260HB2633PN3599 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Reimbursable amount adjustment.--The reimbursable amount for the project, including existing projects, under this article shall be reduced by the amount of the grant received related to the project under section 1753.2-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2633PN3599 - 5 - 123456